Missouri, session 2026, HB2493.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 571, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 571.065, to read as follows:
571.065. 1. An owner of a firearm shall report the loss or theft of the firearm
within seventy-two hours of discovering the loss or theft to the local law enforcement
agency in the city, town, or village or to the sheriff's office in the county in which the loss
or theft occurred. The local law enforcement agency or sheriff's office shall enter the
make, model, and serial number of the firearm into the Missouri uniform law
enforcement system (MULES).
2. Any person who fails to report the loss or theft of a firearm as required under
this section shall, upon a plea or finding of guilt thereof, be guilty of:
(1) An infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed one hundred dollars for a
first violation;
(2) An infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed four hundred dollars for a
second violation; or
(3) A misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars for a
third or subsequent violation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.